North Carolina, session 2025, SB770.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Effective immediately, William "Brian" BC Allen of Wake County
is appointed to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill Board of Trustees for a term
expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of The Honorable Bradford B. Briner.
SECTION 1.2. Effective immediately, The Honorable Joshua "Josh" R. Dobson of
McDowell County is appointed to the Western Carolina University Board of Trustees for a term
expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of The Honorable Kathryn Harrington.
SECTION 1.3. Darrell S. McLean of Caswell County is appointed to the North
Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2029.
SECTION 1.4. Steven D. Wyatt of Henderson County is appointed to the
Appalachian State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.5. Gregory "Gregg" J. Thompson of Wake County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Asheville Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.6. Amy Klein Aznar of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Charlotte Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.7. William Marshall Kotis of Guilford County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.8. Nicholas "Nick" P. Crabtree of Pitt County is appointed to the East
Carolina University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.9. Ven Poole of Wake County is appointed to the North Carolina State
University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.10. Justin L. Waddell of Loudoun County, Virginia, is appointed to the
Elizabeth City State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.11. George G. Hoyle of Guilford County is appointed to the University
of North Carolina at Greensboro Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.12. Kyle Petty of Mecklenburg County is reappointed to the University
of North Carolina School of the Arts Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.13. Jennifer Levy of Montgomery County, Maryland, Fredrick L.
Nelson of Henderson County, and Dr. Anthony Negbenebor of Cleveland County are appointed
*S770-v-4*

to the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics Board of Trustees for terms expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.14. Karen K. King of New Hanover County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Wilmington Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.15. Joseph D. Crocker of Forsyth County is appointed to the Western
Carolina University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.16. Robert Barr of Forsyth County is appointed to the Winston-Salem
State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.17. Frederick D. Nelson, Jr., of Johnston County is appointed to the
Fayetteville State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.18. Francesca D. Gary of Durham County is appointed to the North
Carolina Central University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.19. Dr. Johnanna O. Clark of Bladen County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Pembroke Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.20. Effective immediately, Grant Brooks of Alamance County is
appointed to the Alamance Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2026, to fill the unexpired term of Dr. Charles K. Scott.
SECTION 1.21. Effective immediately, Garland L. Norton of McDowell County is
appointed to the McDowell Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2026, to fill the unexpired term of Nancy Hunter.
SECTION 1.22. Effective immediately, Gary S. Stroud of McDowell County is
appointed to the McDowell Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2026, to fill the unexpired term of Susan English.
SECTION 1.23. Effective immediately, Semone Pemberton of Cumberland County
is appointed to the Fayetteville Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term
expiring June 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of Denver "Ralph" Huff, III.
SECTION 1.24. Effective immediately, Patricia A. Rodgers of Mecklenburg County
is appointed to the Central Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring
June 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of Carrie Baker.
SECTION 1.25. Effective immediately, Ashley P. Leggett of Martin County is
appointed to the Martin Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026,
to fill the unexpired term of KeVonna Hall.
SECTION 1.26. Walter A. Britt of Alamance County is appointed to the Alamance
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.27. Andrew "Drew" M. West of Buncombe County is appointed to the
Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.28. John Rebholz of Beaufort County is appointed to the Beaufort
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.29. G. Dixon Nance, Jr., of Bladen County is appointed to the Bladen
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.30. William R. Rhodes of Henderson County is appointed to the Blue
Ridge Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.31. Sheila D. Grady of Brunswick County is appointed to the
Brunswick Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.32. Katie M. Woodle of Caldwell County is appointed to the Caldwell
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.33. Shannon B. Winslow of New Hanover County is appointed to the
Cape Fear Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.34. Melodie M. Darden of Carteret County is appointed to the Carteret
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 1.35. Dwight E. Shook of Alexander County is appointed to the Catawba
Valley Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.36. Charissa H. Moore of Chatham County is appointed to the Central
Carolina Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.37. Bradford D. Muller of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Central Piedmont Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.38. Robert P. Queen of Cleveland County is appointed to the Cleveland
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.39. L. Ward Sylvester, III, of Onslow County is appointed to the
Coastal Carolina Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.40. Thomas O. Fulcher, Jr., of Dare County is appointed to the College
of The Albemarle Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.41. Daniel "Dan" M. Roberts of Craven County is appointed to the
Craven Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.42. Jason Gibson of Davidson County is appointed to the
Davidson-Davie Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.43. Nicholas J. Tennyson of Durham County is appointed to the
Durham Technical Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.44. Joy M. Chafin of Edgecombe County is appointed to the
Edgecombe Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.45. Kenneth W. Smith of Cumberland County is appointed to the
Fayetteville Technical Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.46. Charles A. Corpening of Forsyth County is appointed to the Forsyth
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.47. Judge Jesse B. Caldwell, III, of Gaston County is appointed to the
Gaston College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.48. Lisa S. Jessar of Guilford County is appointed to the Guilford
Technical Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.49. Joyce V. Buffaloe of Northampton County is appointed to the
Halifax Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.50. William H. Hollingsed, III, of Haywood County is appointed to the
Haywood Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.51. Bryson C. Smith of Rutherford County is appointed to the
Isothermal Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.52. Robert "Rob" E. Bogaard of New Hanover County is appointed to
the James Sprunt Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.53. Gregory P. Whitehurst of Johnston County is appointed to the
Johnston Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.54. Robin A. Roberson of Lenoir County is appointed to the Lenoir
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.55. Dr. Derrick L. Wilkins of Martin County is appointed to the Martin
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.56. Jeffery S. Gouge of Mitchell County is appointed to the Mayland
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.57. Darren M. Waugh of McDowell County is appointed to the
McDowell Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.58. The Honorable Constantine "Costi" H. Kutteh of Iredell County is
appointed to the Mitchell Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.59. Jelinda "Brooke" B. Cranford of Montgomery County is appointed
to the Montgomery Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 3

SECTION 1.60. Amy S. Pearson of Nash County is appointed to the Nash
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.61. Cecilia A. "Candy" Bohmert of Pamlico County is appointed to the
Pamlico Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.62. Dustin G. Brann of Person County is appointed to the Piedmont
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.63. David L. Davenport of Pitt County is appointed to the Pitt
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.64. Grant Hollowell of Guilford County is appointed to the Randolph
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.65. James N. Tate of Richmond County is appointed to the Richmond
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.66. Geneva Riddick-Faulkner of Northampton County is appointed to
the Roanoke-Chowan Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.67. Timothy B. Brooks of Robeson County is appointed to the Robeson
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.68. Alan R. Isley of Rockingham County is appointed to the
Rockingham Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.69. Brittany H. Barnhardt of Rowan County is appointed to the
Rowan-Cabarrus Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.70. Donna C. Bullard of Cumberland County is appointed to the
Sampson Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.71. William R. Maness of Moore County is appointed to the Sandhills
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.72. Jeffrey P. Nahrgang of Cabarrus County is appointed to the South
Piedmont Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.73. Brett C. Burroughs of Columbus County is appointed to the
Southeastern Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.74. Jenny S. Holland of Swain County is appointed to the Southwestern
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.75. Blake E. Underwood of Stanly County is appointed to the Stanly
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.76. Barbara H. Harrell of Surry County is appointed to the Surry
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.77. Brandon K. Lovin of Graham County is appointed to the Tri-County
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.78. Xavier L. Wortham of Granville County is appointed to the
Vance-Granville Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.79. Jennifer H. Willis of Wake County is appointed to the Wake
Technical Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.80. Ryan H. Morgan of Burke County is appointed to the Western
Piedmont Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.81. Arnold N. Lakey of Wilkes County is appointed to the Wilkes
Community College Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.82. Effective immediately, Chief Todd Coring of Brunswick County is
appointed to the 911 Board for a term expiring December 31, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of
Brandon Medina.
SECTION 1.83. Effective immediately, Timothy D. Holleman of Guilford County
is appointed to the Building Code Council for a term expiring January 1, 2029, to fill the
unexpired term of Ritchie Holt.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 1.84. Effective immediately, David "Brian" B. Sutphin of Johnston
County is appointed to the North Carolina Board of Funeral Service for a term expiring December
31, 2026, to fill the unexpired term of Roger Barnes.
SECTION 1.85. Effective immediately, Kevin N. Lewis of Nash County is
appointed to the State Ethics Commission for a term expiring December 31, 2026, to fill the
unexpired term of Francis De Luca.
SECTION 1.86. Effective immediately, Malcolm K. Fearing of Dare County is
appointed to the North Carolina Housing Partnership for a term expiring August 31, 2026, to fill
the unexpired term of Sallie Surface.
SECTION 1.87. Effective immediately, Tembila Covington of Forsyth County is
appointed to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., Board of Directors for a term
expiring December 31, 2025, to fill the unexpired term of Nell Rose.
SECTION 1.88. Effective immediately, Lynn T. Clark of Guilford County is
appointed to the North Carolina Board of Transportation for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.89. William "Bill" W. Nelson of Wake County and Wyatt T. Dixon,
III, of Mecklenburg County are appointed to the Rules Review Commission for terms expiring
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.90. Cindi Fox Kemp of Wake County is appointed to the Acupuncture
Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.92. Warren "Lentz" Brewer of New Hanover County is appointed to
the Board of Trustees of the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System for a term
expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.93. Joseph P. Slater of Union County is appointed to the Board of
Trustees for the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees for a term expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 1.94. Daniel A. Ward of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the North
Carolina Investment Authority Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026.
SECTION 1.95. Dr. Sy A. Saeed of Pitt County and Reem S. Utterback of Wake
County are appointed to the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities and
Substance Abuse Services for terms expiring July 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.96. Mel L. Chilton of New Hanover County is appointed to the Crime
Victims Compensation Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.97. Heath R. Jenkins of Lincoln County is appointed to the Disciplinary
Hearing Commission of the North Carolina State Bar for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.98. Effective September 1, 2025, Carianne E. Fisher of Durham
County, TeAndra M. Miller of Wake County, Avis Watkins-Smith of Harnett County, and Cathy
Cloninger of Gaston County are appointed to the Domestic Violence Commission for terms
expiring August 31, 2027.
SECTION 1.99. Effective December 1, 2025, Joshua A. Yost of Wake County is
appointed to the Economic Investment Committee for a term expiring November 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.100. The Honorable James Burgin of Harnett County, The Honorable
Mark Hollo of Catawba County, The Honorable Benton G. Sawrey of Johnston County, Dr.
David Y. Huang of Orange County, Adrienne G. Calhoun of Guilford County, Dr. Lindsey H.
Maslow of Orange County, Christy E. Land of Richmond County, and Tara Aker of Randolph
County are appointed to the Justus-Warren Heart Disease and Stroke Prevention Task Force for
terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.101. Effective January 1, 2026, Michael W. Shelton of Rockingham
County, Charles "Chuck" C. Heald of Durham County, and Jennifer L. Robinson of McDowell
County are appointed to the License to Give Trust Fund for terms expiring December 31, 2027.
SECTION 1.102. Michael C. Brown of New Hanover County is appointed to the
Local Government Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 5

SECTION 1.103. Katherine L. Salmons of Buncombe County and Dr. Stephanie R.
Robinson of New Hanover County are appointed to the North Carolina Addictions Specialist
Professional Practice Board for terms expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.104. Hunter "Gregg" Strader of Guilford County is appointed to the
North Carolina Agricultural Finance Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.105. Effective January 1, 2026, William K. Graham of Wake County
is appointed to the North Carolina Board of Barber and Electrolysis Examiners for a term
expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.106. Dr. Thomas J. Williams of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Science, Technology, and Innovation for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.107. Dr. Phillip M. Stephens of Robeson County is appointed to the
North Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.108. William B. Hill of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Cemetery Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.109.(a) Gerald McNair of Wake County and Todd H. Godbey of New
Hanover County are appointed to the North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for terms
expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.109.(b) Dr. Rita C. Haire of Davidson County, and Dr. John A. Eldridge
of Chatham County are appointed to the North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for terms
expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.110. Terra W. Flint of Rockingham County and Alicia R. Fink of Wake
County are appointed to the North Carolina Child Care Commission for terms expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 1.111. Sarah L. Mobraten of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Code Officials Qualification Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.112. Ronald L. Parrish of Alamance County, Michael D. Stagle of
Mitchell County, Richard A. Epley of Burke County, and Jamie L. Bullard of Columbus County
are appointed to the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.113. Ellen N. Thomas of Mecklenburg County and Daniel Kiger of
Surry County are appointed to the North Carolina Criminal Justice Information Network
Governing Board for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.114. Stephen E. Griffin of Durham County and Randall "Randy" S.
Burns of Burke County are appointed to the North Carolina Education and Workforce Innovation
Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.115. Effective January 1, 2026, Charles "Chuck" J. Elledge of Wilkes
County is appointed to the North Carolina Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council for a
term expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.116. Diane R. Hardison of Martin County is appointed to the North
Carolina Environmental Management Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.117. Danny Barwick Smith of Lenoir County is appointed to the North
Carolina Global TransPark Authority Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.118. Paul L. Kennedy of Brunswick County, Leigh T. Brown of
Cabarrus County, Gary T. Embler of Cabarrus County, and Lavonda R. Daniels of Carteret
County are appointed to the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency for terms expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 1.119. Effective January 1, 2026, Richard B. Montague of Mitchell
County, Michael N. Tart of Cumberland County, and Andrew N. Kaiser of Catawba County are
appointed to the North Carolina Institute of Medicine Board of Directors for terms expiring
December 31, 2029.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 1.120. Effective October 1, 2025, Daniel C. Baker of Lee County is
appointed to the North Carolina Irrigation Contractors' Licensing Board for a term expiring
September 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.121. Effective July 2, 2025, Terry A. Shelton of Rockingham County
is appointed to the North Carolina Land and Water Fund for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.122. Effective January 1, 2026, Jack A. Walder of Wake County is
appointed to the North Carolina Locksmith Licensing Board for a term expiring December 31,
2028.
SECTION 1.123. Neal R. Locklear of Robeson County and Charles S. Stone of
Robeson County are appointed to the North Carolina Manufactured Housing Board for terms
expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.124. Mark G. Vrablic of Dare County is appointed to the North Carolina
Marine Industrial Park Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.125. Peggy L. Wilks of Wake County and Mary "Jo" Cresimore of
Wake County are appointed to the North Carolina Museum of Art Board of Trustees for terms
expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.126. William "Russ" R. Davis of Onslow County is appointed to the
North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board for a term
expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.127. Effective July 2, 2025, Benjamin Curtis of Rockingham County is
appointed to the North Carolina Parks and Recreation Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.128. Effective January 1, 2026, Paula J. Yost of Cabarrus County,
Rebekah P. Leonard of Gaston County, and Page Ives Lemel of Transylvania County are
appointed to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., Board of Directors for terms
expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.129. Effective September 1, 2025, Dr. Paula G. Price of Guilford
County, Ida M. Weisner of Yadkin County, and Paola Sztajn of Wake County are appointed to
the North Carolina Professional Educator Preparation and Standards Commission for terms
expiring August 31, 2027.
SECTION 1.130. Thomas W. Glasgow of Carteret County is appointed to the North
Carolina Railroad Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.131. William "Wes" L. Hall of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Recreational Therapy Licensure Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.132. Effective November 1, 2025, Lanny S. Inabnit of Cabarrus County
is appointed to the North Carolina Respiratory Care Board for a term expiring October 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.133. Eschol "BJ" Barnes, Jr., of Guilford County is appointed to the
North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission for a term expiring June
30, 2027.
SECTION 1.134. John N. Ogburn of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Building Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.135. Gerald Goolsby of Robeson County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Commission of Indian Affairs for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.136. Douglas D. Boyette of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Human Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.137. Patrick P. Joyce of Carteret County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Ports Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.138. Dr. Christiaan J. Ramsey of Madison County is appointed to the
North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.139. Thomas Berry of Guilford County, Mark Craig of Guilford
County, Landon Zimmer of New Hanover County, and John M. Alexander of Wake County are
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 7

appointed to the North Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission for terms expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 1.140. Effective October 1, 2025, Kevin R. Howell of Transylvania
County is appointed to the North Carolina Youth Outdoor Engagement Commission for a term
expiring September 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.141. William "Bill" D. MacRae of Wake County and Stacy E. Buff of
McDowell County are appointed to the Private Protective Services Board for terms expiring June
30, 2028.
SECTION 1.142. Dr. Joseph W. Democko of Wayne County is appointed to the
State Board of Chiropractic Examiners for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.143. Stacy R. Griffin of Mecklenburg County, Thomas S. Ottman of
Chatham County, Dr. William D. McInnis of Richmond County, Paula T. Benson of Wilson
County, and Geoffrey J. Lang of Wake County are appointed to the State Board of Community
Colleges for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.144. Tana C. Tucker of Caldwell County is appointed to the State Board
of Cosmetic Art Examiners for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.145. James M. Richardson of Wake County is appointed to the
Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.146. Mason M. James of Rockingham County is appointed to the State
Fire and Rescue Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.147. Catherine K. Watts of Wake County is appointed to the University
of North Carolina Center for Public Media Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 1.148. Effective November 1, 2025, D. Brandon Greife of Wake County
is appointed to the UNC Health Care System Board of Directors for a term expiring October 31,
2029.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. James E. Harris of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Appalachian State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.2. Richard Balot of Pitt County is appointed to the East Carolina
University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.3. James R. Copeland, IV, of Craven County is appointed to the
Elizabeth City State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.4. Effective immediately, James A. Kinion of Wake County is
appointed to the Elizabeth City State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2027, to fill the unexpired term of The Honorable Paul N. Tine.
SECTION 2.5. William R. Warner of Cumberland County is appointed to the
Fayetteville State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.6. James W. Kee, Jr., of Guilford County is appointed to the North
Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2029.
SECTION 2.7. Dr. Orlando R. Stovall of Wayne County is appointed to the North
Carolina Central University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.8. Harry M. Shaw of New Hanover County is appointed to the North
Carolina State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.9. Thomas D. Hunter, IV, of Buncombe County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Asheville Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.10. Vinay Patel of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the University
of North Carolina at Chapel Hill Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.11. David R. Ravin of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Charlotte Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Page 8 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 2.12. Matthew M. Rankin of Guilford County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Greensboro Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.13. Allison Harrington Walters of Robeson County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina at Pembroke Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.14. Charles F. McDowell, IV, of Davidson County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina School of the Arts Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2029.
SECTION 2.15. Carrie B. Shields of Wayne County is appointed to the University
of North Carolina at Wilmington Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.16. The Honorable Jon Hardister of Guilford County is appointed to
the Western Carolina University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.17. Harold J. Eustache, Jr., of Forsyth County is appointed to the
Winston-Salem State University Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.18. Dr. Kamal Kolappa of Wake County, Linda B. Sayed of New
Hanover County, and Elizabeth Karan of Granville County are appointed to the North Carolina
School of Science and Mathematics Board of Trustees for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.19. Effective November 1, 2025, Dr. R. Paul Rieker, Jr., of Wake
County is appointed to the UNC Healthcare System Board of Directors for a term expiring
October 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.20. John M. Kane of Wake County, Terry K. Yeargan of Wake County,
and Dr. David A. Lowry of Caldwell County are appointed to the State Board of Community
Colleges for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.21. Dr. Roslyn M. Crisp of Alamance County is appointed to the
Alamance Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.22. Benjamin P. Teague of Buncombe County is appointed to the
Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2029.
SECTION 2.23. Jonathon D. Oliver of Beaufort County is appointed to the Beaufort
County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.24.(a) Jennifer S. Hensley of Henderson County is appointed to the
Blue Ridge Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.24.(b) Dr. Arthur H. Pearsall of Henderson County is appointed to the
Blue Ridge Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.25. Zachary L. Hewett of Brunswick County is appointed to the
Brunswick Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.26. Marilyn C. Starnes of Caldwell County is appointed to the Caldwell
Community College and Technical Institute Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.27. Cailey F. Rash of New Hanover County is appointed to the Cape
Fear Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.28. Catherine W. Parker of Carteret County is appointed to the Carteret
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.29. Effective immediately, Robert E. Gonzalez of Catawba County is
appointed to the Catawba Valley Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Ivy Robinson.
SECTION 2.30. Logan M. Kale of Catawba County is appointed to the Catawba
Valley Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.31. Thomas A. Womble of Harnett County is appointed to the Central
Carolina Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.32. Caldwell R. Rose of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Central Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 9

SECTION 2.33. H. Allen Langley of Cleveland County is appointed to the
Cleveland Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.34. Jeffrey T. Clark of Onslow County is appointed to the Coastal
Carolina Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.35. Andrea R. Williams of Pasquotank County is appointed to the
College of The Albemarle Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.36. Henry N. Stilley of Craven County is appointed to the Craven
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.37. Joe W. Carroll of Davidson County is appointed to the
Davidson-Davie Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.38.(a) Steven D. Earp of Durham County is appointed to the Durham
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2.38.(b) The Honorable J. Michael Woodard of Durham County is
appointed to the Durham Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.39. The Honorable Earl L. Taylor of Edgecombe County is appointed
to the Edgecombe Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.40. Michael C. Chandler of Cumberland County is appointed to the
Fayetteville Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.41. Calvin McRae, II, of Forsyth County is appointed to the Forsyth
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.42. Jonathan L. Fletcher of Gaston County is appointed to the Gaston
College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.43. Lisa Stahlmann Jessar of Guilford County is appointed to the
Guilford Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.44.(a) William B. Carroll, Jr., of Halifax County is appointed to the
Halifax Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.44.(b) Tony N. Brown of Halifax County is appointed to the Halifax
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.45. Angela O. Lunsford of Haywood County is appointed to the
Haywood Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.46. Jerrell S. "Steve" Bedford, Jr., of Rutherford County is appointed
to the Isothermal Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.47. Stephen E. Emory of Duplin County is appointed to the James
Sprunt Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.48. Tommy G. Williams of Johnston County is appointed to the
Johnston Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.49. Edward R. "Randy" Smith of Lenoir County is appointed to the
Lenoir Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.50. Dr. Thomas F. Daly, III, of Martin County is appointed to the
Martin Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.51. Effective immediately, Watsi M. Sutton of Martin County is
appointed to the Martin Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027,
to fill the unexpired term of Clarence Pointe.
SECTION 2.52. Linda Kay P. Medford of McDowell County is appointed to the
McDowell Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.53. William "Bill" Thunberg of Mitchell County is appointed to the
Mitchell Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.54. Michael C. Jones of Montgomery County is appointed to the
Montgomery Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 2.55. Natalie Brooks of Nash County is appointed to the Nash
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.56. William S. Smith of Pamlico County is appointed to the Pamlico
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.57. The Honorable Kyle Puryear of Person County is appointed to the
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.58.(a) Daniel L. Taylor, Jr., of Pitt County is appointed to the Pitt
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2.58.(b) Charles G. "Greg" Lassiter of Pitt County is appointed to the Pitt
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.59. The Honorable Allen McNeill of Randolph County is appointed to
the Randolph Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.60. James M. Wright of Richmond County is appointed to the
Richmond Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.61. Sheila V. Eley of Hertford County is appointed to the
Roanoke-Chowan Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.62. The Honorable Tiffany P. Powers of Robeson County is appointed
to the Robeson Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.63. Randy D. Judkins of Rockingham County is appointed to the
Rockingham Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.64. Paul A. Brown of Rowan County is appointed to the
Rowan-Cabarrus Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.65. Frederick H. Beaujeu-Dufour of Sampson County is appointed to
the Sampson Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.66. Larry R. Caddell of Moore County is appointed to the Sandhills
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.67. W. Clifton Martin, III, of Anson County is appointed to the South
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.68. Christopher C. Russell of Columbus County is appointed to the
Southeastern Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.69. James K. "JK" Coward of Jackson County is appointed to the
Southwestern Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.70. Michael E. Snyder of Stanly County is appointed to the Stanly
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.71. Benjamin T. Griffin of Surry County is appointed to the Surry
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.72. Lumpy Lambert of Cherokee County is appointed to the Tri-County
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.73. William H. Wynn of Granville County is appointed to the
Vance-Granville Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.74. O. Temple Sloan, IV, of Wake County is appointed to the Wake
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.75. Veda McNair of Wayne County is appointed to the Wayne
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.76. Beth Z. Heile of Burke County is appointed to the Western
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.77. John G. Vannoy of Wilkes County is appointed to the Wilkes
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.78. The Honorable Kenneth J. Fontenot of Wilson County is appointed
to the Wilson Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 11

SECTION 2.79. Effective October 1, 2025, Jazmine S. Kilpatrick of Wake County
is appointed to the African American Heritage Commission for a term expiring September 30,
2028.
SECTION 2.80. Dr. Mary C. Majebe of Buncombe County is appointed to the
Acupuncture Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.81. Douglas S. Penland of Clay County and Richard Stout of Onslow
County are appointed to the North Carolina Center for the Advancement of Teaching Board of
Trustees for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.82. Earl W. Worley, Jr., of Wayne County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Banking Commission for a term that began April 1, 2025, and expires March 31,
2029.
SECTION 2.83. Dennis Reno of Cleveland County is appointed to the North
Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.84. The Honorable Myron Yoder of Polk County is appointed to the
State Building Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.85. William W. "Bill" Gaffney of Transylvania County is appointed to
the Cemetery Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.86. Hilda Parler of Franklin County and Lindalyn Kakadelis of Moore
County are appointed to the North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for terms expiring
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.87. Dr. Shelley Shope of Cleveland County and Bruce Friend of Wake
County are appointed to the North Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for terms expiring
June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.88. Erica L. Simmons of Burke County and Lea Gombar of Wake
County are appointed to the North Carolina Child Care Commission for terms expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 2.89. Dr. Rod Brown, DC, of Guilford County is appointed to the State
Board of Chiropractic Examiners for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.90. James W.C. Broughton of Forsyth County is appointed to the North
Carolina Land and Water Fund for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 2.91. Anthony D. Casey of Wake County is appointed to the Code
Officials Qualifications Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.92. Chet A. Effler of McDowell County, David L. Rose of Stokes
County, Brian Gates of Surry County, and Sean L. Owens of Davidson County are appointed to
the Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission for terms expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 2.93. Laura L. Fahnestock of Wake County is appointed to the Criminal
Justice Information Network Governing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.94. Effective September 1, 2025, Saira Estrada of Durham County, The
Honorable Nathaniel M. Knust of Cabarrus County, and Michelle Bardsley of Guilford County
are appointed to the Domestic Violence Commission for terms expiring August 31, 2027.
SECTION 2.95. Richard L. Purcell of Mecklenburg County, Rachelle "Shelley"
Wolford of Wake County, and Paul F. Worley of Cherokee County are appointed to the
Education and Workforce Innovation Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.96. Effective January 1, 2026, Representative Hugh Blackwell of Burke
County is appointed to the Education Commission of the States for a term expiring December
31, 2027.
SECTION 2.97. Steven P. Keen of Wayne County and Jared C. Wright of Caldwell
County are appointed to the Environmental Management Commission for terms expiring June
30, 2029.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 2.98. William T. Lamm, III, of Wilson County and Steve R. Mayo of
Wayne County are appointed to the North Carolina Global TransPark Authority Board of
Directors for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.99. William H. Morris of Harnett County is appointed to the Home
Inspector Licensure Board for a term expiring July 1, 2029.
SECTION 2.100. Tom Smith of Wake County, Jason Triplett of Ashe County, Paul
S. Jaber of Nash County, and Lynn Pinter of Haywood County are appointed to the North
Carolina Housing Finance Agency for terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.101. Effective immediately, James E. Sponenberg, III, of Caldwell
County is appointed to the Ethics Commission for a term expiring December 31, 2028, to fill the
unexpired term of The Honorable Carl J. Stewart of Gaston County.
SECTION 2.102. Effective October 1, 2025, Agnes B. Gambill West of
Mecklenburg County is appointed to the North Carolina Innovation Council for a term expiring
September 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.103. Effective October 1, 2025, Jeffrey B. Turner of Lenoir County and
Blannie C. Miller of Wake County are appointed to NCInnovation for terms expiring September
30, 2029.
SECTION 2.104. Effective January 1, 2026, Timothy Norris of Rowan County,
Riteshkumar D. Patel of Wake County, Dr. Christopher T. Grubb of Pitt County, and Dr. Abhijit
Roychowdhury of Wake County are appointed to the North Carolina Institute of Medicine for
terms expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.105. Effective January 1, 2026, Representative Diane Wheatley of
Cumberland County is appointed to the Interstate Commission on Educational Opportunities for
Military Children State Council for a term expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.106. The Honorable Barbara G. Beatty of Catawba County, Ashley M.
Honeycutt of Wake County, Representative Frank Iler of Brunswick County, Representative
Becky Carney of Mecklenburg County, Representative Timothy Reeder, MD, of Pitt County,
Amanda L. Wilson of Chatham County, Ryan S. Swanson of Wake County, and Joseph E. Propst,
Jr., of Wake County are appointed to the Justus Warren Heart Disease and Stroke Prevention
Task Force for terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.107. Thomas A. Stith, III, of Wake County is appointed to the Local
Government Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.108. Effective January 1, 2026, Elizabeth N. Overby of Wake County
is appointed to the Locksmith Licensing Board for a term expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 2.109. Russell C. King of Dare County is appointed to the Marine
Industrial Park Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.110. Charles B. Sutton of Forsyth County and Isabel V. Shaheen of
Mecklenburg County are appointed to the North Carolina Museum of Art Board of Trustees for
terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.111. Jerry O. Pearce of Wake County is appointed to the Onsite
Wastewater Contractor's and Inspector's Certification Board for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 2.112. Effective October 1, 2025, Rick G. McCreary of Caldwell County
is appointed to the North Carolina Youth Outdoor Engagement Commission for a term expiring
September 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.113. Clay A. McCreary of Caldwell County is appointed to the Parks
and Recreation Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 2.114. Kenny W. Woodard of Johnston County is appointed to the North
Carolina Ports Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.115. Paul J. Schroll of Cabarrus County and Suzanne C. Creech of Pitt
County are appointed to the Private Protection Services Board for terms expiring July 1, 2028.
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 13

SECTION 2.116. Effective September 1, 2025, Tracie M. Jenkins of Gaston County,
Dr. Aaron Fleming of Alamance County, Craig S. Smith of Mecklenburg County, and Virginia
A. Bullock of Alamance County are appointed to the Professional Educator Preparation and
Standards Commission for terms expiring August 31, 2027.
SECTION 2.117. James Nance of Stanly County is appointed to the North Carolina
Railroad Company Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.118. P. Dave Newkirk of Guilford County is appointed to the
Recreational Therapy Licensure Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.119. Phillip J. Parker, Jr., of Johnston County, Christopher C. Loutit of
Wake County, and Wayne R. Boyles, III, of Moore County are appointed to the Rules Review
Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.120. Richard G. Kristoff of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Science and Technology for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.121. Jason M. Hall of Franklin County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Licensing for Soil Scientists for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.122. Michael Brent Gordon of Cleveland County is appointed to the
State Fire and Rescue Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.123. J. Michael Stevenson of Nash County is appointed to the State
Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 2.124. Corey A. Gooden of Chowan County is appointed to the State
Water Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2.125. Robert J. Shea of Alamance County is appointed to the
Supplemental Retirement Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.126. The Honorable Pat Hurley of Randolph County is appointed to the
Teachers and State Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30,
2027.
SECTION 2.127. Dr. Prince Bull, Sr., of Gaston County is appointed to the Teaching
Fellows Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.128. Brian Edlin of Wake County and Melissa Matton of Wake County
are appointed to the Umstead Review Panel for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.129. Chauncey Leggett of Nash County and Chad W. Julian of Iredell
County are appointed to the Well Contractors Certification Commission for terms expiring June
30, 2028.
SECTION 2.130. Tommy Fonville of Wake County, John A. Stone of Moore
County, John T. Coley of Wake County, Reid M. Smith of Sampson County, and Vernon Ray
Clifton, Jr., of Bladen County are appointed to the North Carolina Wildlife Resources
Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2.131. The Honorable N. Leo Daughtry of Johnston County, The
Honorable Charles W. McGrady of Henderson County, and Stephen Rosenburgh of Mecklenburg
County are appointed to the North Carolina Board of Transportation for terms expiring June 30,
2026.
PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.1. Unless otherwise provided, all appointments made by this act are for
terms that begin on July 1, 2025.
Page 14 Session Law 2025-29 Senate Bill 770

SECTION 3.2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Senate Bill 770 Session Law 2025-29 Page 15